North Dakota, session 69, HB1285.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. STATE EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS - GUIDELINES -
INTENT.
1. The 2025-27 biennium compensation adjustments for permanent state employees are
to average 3 percent per eligible employee for the first fiscal year of the biennium and
are to average 2 percent per eligible employee for the second year of the biennium.
The increases for the first year of the biennium are to be given beginning with the
month of July 2025, to be paid in August 2025, and for the second year of the
biennium are to be given beginning with the month of July 2026, to be paid in August
2026. Increases for eligible state employees are to be based on documented
performance and are not to be the same percentage increase for each employee.
2. The office of management and budget shall develop guidelines for use by state
agencies for providing compensation adjustments for classified state employees. The
guidelines must follow the compensation philosophy statement under section
54-44.3-01.2.
3. Probationary employees are not entitled to the increases. However, at the discretion of
the appointing authority, probationary employees may be given all or a portion of the
increases effective in July, paid in August, or upon completion of probation. Employees
whose overall documented performance level does not meet standards are not eligible
for any salary increase.
Page No. 1 25.0143.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
4. It is the intent of the sixty-ninth legislative assembly that an appropriation be provided
to each state agency for the costs of providing the compensation adjustments under
this section.
5. It is the intent of the sixty-ninth legislative assembly that the amounts provided for the
2025-27 biennium state employee compensation increases are one-half of the
6 percent first year and 4 percent second year increases approved by the sixty-eighth
legislative assembly for the 2023-25 biennium. It is further the intent of the legislative
assembly the funding available because of this reduction in state employee
compensation increases be transferred to the teachers' fund for retirement.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - TRANSFER - GENERAL FUND TO TEACHERS' FUND
FOR RETIREMENT - SUPPLEMENTAL PAYMENT.
1. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, the sum of $49,200,000, which the office of management and
budget shall transfer to the teachers' fund for retirement during the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
2. The amount of funding transferred under this section, which represents one-half of the
estimated general fund cost of providing state employee compensation increases of
6 percent the first year and 4 percent the second year of the 2023-25 biennium, must
be used for a one-time supplemental payment to eligible retirees in recognition of
cost-of-living adjustments.
Page No. 2 25.0143.01000